District of Columbia statutes.
16-1365

Appeal; deficiency judgment.

A party aggrieved by a final judgment in a proceeding pursuant to this subchapter may appeal therefrom to the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit. The appeal, or any bond or undertaking given therein, does not operate to prevent or delay the vesting of title to the property in the United States, but upon the filing of a declaration of taking, or, if a declaration of taking is not filed, upon payment to the party entitled, or deposit in the registry of the court, of the amount awarded by the judgment, title vests in the United States, saving to all parties their right to just compensation. If the compensation finally awarded and adjudged for the property exceeds the amount awarded and adjudged by the judgment appealed from, the court shall enter judgment for the deficiency with interest as provided by this subchapter.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 580, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-1365.
1973 Ed., § 16-1365.